New York, session 2025-2026, A11464.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 3 of chapter 141 of the laws of 2 2014 amending the environmental conservation law relating to authorizing 3 the hunting of big game in the county of Albany with rifles, as amended 4 by chapter 258 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 5 (c) nothing contained in this act shall be construed so as to extend 6 the provisions of this act beyond October 1, [2026] 2028, when upon such 7 date this act shall expire and the provisions contained herein shall be 8 deemed repealed. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15953-01-6